Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-103
Gasoline and other explosives; sale; containers or portable tanks; type required.

Every person within this state retailing gasoline, benzine, and other similar types of high explosives in less than carload lots shall deliver the same to the purchaser only in containers or portable tanks painted vermillion red and having the word gasoline, benzine, or whatever name such explosive is known by plainly printed on it in English. All such words shall be in letters sufficiently large to attract attention.

Laws 1907, c. 86, § 1, p. 305;

R.S.1913, § 5754;

C.S.1922, § 5099;

C.S.1929, § 66-103;

R.S.1943, § 66-103;

Laws 1985, LB 441, § 1.